apertium-kor.kor.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for kor

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<npr%>   ! proper noun
%<nnc%>   ! common noun
%<nnx%>   ! dependent noun
%<npn%>   ! pronoun
%<nnu%>   ! ordinal, cardinal, numeral
%<vv%>   ! verb
%<vj%>   ! adjective
%<adj%> ! when vj becomes like an adjective
%<vx%>   ! auxiliary predicate
%<adv%> ! clausal verb
%<adc%> ! conjunctive adbverb
%<dan%> ! Determiner
%<ij%>  ! Interjection

! PCA: Postposition - case
%<pca%> ! function tag 
%<nom%> ! Nominative
%<acc%> ! Accusative
%<gen%> ! Genitive
%<dat%> ! Dative
%<loc%> ! Locative
%<ins%> ! Instrumental
%<com%> ! Comitative
%<top%> ! Topic
%<add%> ! Additive
%<con%> ! Conjunctive
%<tra%> ! Transitive
%<voc%> ! Vocative

! PAD: Postposition - adverbial
%<pad%> ! 

! PCJ: Postposition - conjunctive
%<pcj%> ! 

! PAU: Postposition - auxiliary
%<pau%> ! 
%<exc%> ! exclusive = on;y
%<als%> ! also
%<evn%> ! even

! Trnasitivityh
%<tv%> ! 
%<iv%> ! 

! CO: copula
%<cop%> ! 

! Ending: final (efn)
%<efn%> ! function tag 
%<aff%> ! Affirmative
%<itg%> ! Interrogative
%<neg%> ! Negative
%<imp%> ! Imperative
%<dec%> ! Declarative
%<inj%> ! Injunctive
%<prp%> ! Propositive
%<exc%> ! exclamatory
%<snc%> !  - find better name

! Ending: coordinate (ECN)
%<ecs%> ! 

! Ending: auxiliary (EAU)
%<eau%> ! 

! Ending: admonial (EAN)
%<ean%> ! 
%<pass%> !
%<act%> !
%<desf%> ! sub category - future descript
%<despr%> ! sub category - present descript
%<despa%> ! sub category - present descript

! Ending: nomial (ENM)
%<enm%> ! 

! Ending: prefinal ending - tense, honorific (ENM)
%<enm%> ! function tag 
%<pres%> ! Present
%<past%> ! Past
%<fut%> ! Future
%<fam%> ! familiar
%<hon%> ! Honorific

! Affix: suffix (XSF)
%<xsf%> ! 

! Affix: prefix (XPF)
%<xpf%> ! 

! Affix: verbalization suffix (XSV)
%<xsv%> ! 

! Affix: adjectivization (XSJ)
%<xsj%> ! 

! Number morphology - not in penn guideline
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular - omit by default

! Animacy
%<aa%> ! Animate
%<nn%> ! Inanimate

! Other symbols
%>            ! Morpheme boundary
%,            !
%.            !
%.%.          !
%.%.%.        !
%             ! Space
%-            !
%%            !	
%?            !	
%!            !	

%<unk%>       ! For foreign tokens

! Punctuation
%<percent%>   ! Percent
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)



! Chars
ㄱ !
ㄴ !
ㄷ !
ㄹ !
ㅁ !
ㅂ !
ㅅ !
ㅇ !
ㅈ !
ㅊ !
ㅋ !
ㅌ !
ㅍ !
ㅎ !
ㄲ !
ㄸ !
ㅃ !
ㅆ !
ㅉ !
ㅏ !
ㅑ !
ㅓ !
ㅕ !
ㅗ !
ㅛ !
ㅜ !
ㅠ !
ㅡ !
ㅣ !
ㅐ !
ㅒ !
ㅔ !
ㅖ !
ㅘ !
ㅙ !
ㅚ !
ㅝ !
ㅞ !
ㅟ !
ㅢ !
ㄳ !
ㄵ !
ㄶ !
ㄺ !
ㄻ !
ㄼ !
ㄽ !
ㄾ !
ㄿ !
ㅀ !
ㅄ !
%{ㅇ%} !
%{ㄴ%} !
%{ㄹ%} !
%{ㅆ%} !
%{ㅅ%} !
%{ㅡ%} !
%{ㅣ%} !
%{ㅓ%} !
%{ㅏ%} !
%{ㅕ%} !

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!	!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Root

Noun ; 
Verb ; ! equivalnet ot predicate class containing veb, adjective, auxiliary predicate
Adverb ; 
Admonial ;
Interjection ; 
Punctuation ; 
Copula ;


LEXICON NPR !proper noun

%<npr%>:%> # ;
%<npr%>%<top%>:%>ㄴㅡㄴ #; !
%<npr%>%<acc%>:%>ㄹㅡㄹ #; !
%<npr%>%<nom%>:%>ㄱㅏ #; !
%<npr%>%<com%>:%>ㅇㅘ #; !
%<npr%>%<com%>:%>ㄹㅏㅇ #; !
%<npr%>%<com%>:%>ㅎㅏㄱㅗ #; !
%<npr%>%<ins%>:%>%{ㅇ%}%{ㅡ%}ㄹㅗ #; !	
%<npr%>%<gen%>:%>ㅇㅢ #; !
%<npr%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:%>ㄲㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<aa%>%<dat%>:%>ㅇㅔㄱㅔ #; !
%<npr%>%<dat%>:%>ㅇㅔ #; !
%<npr%>%<aa%>%<loc%>:%>ㅇㅔㄱㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<loc%>:%>ㅇㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<voc%>:%>ㅇㅑ #; !
%<npr%>%<exc%>:%>ㅁㅏㄴ #; !
%<npr%>%<als%>:%>ㄷㅗ #; !
%<npr%>%<evn%>:%>ㅁㅏㅈㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<snc%>:%>ㅂㅜㅌㅓ #; !


%<npr%>%<pl%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹ  # ; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<top%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄴㅡㄴ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅡㄹ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄱㅏ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅘ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅏㅇ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅎㅏㄱㅗ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅗ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅢ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄲㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<aa%>%<dat%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㄱㅔ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<aa%>%<loc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㄱㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅑ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<exc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅁㅏㄴ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<als%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄷㅗ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<evn%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅁㅏㅈㅓ #; !
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<snc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅂㅜㅌㅓ #; !

%<npr%>%<cop%>:%>%{ㅇ%}%{ㅣ%}ㄷㅏ #; !
%<npr%>%<cop%>:%>ㅇㅣㄷㅏ #; ! ! Dir/LR
%<npr%>%<pl%>%<cop%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅣㄷㅏ #; !
	
LEXICON NNC  !common noun

%<nnc%>:%> # ;
%<nnc%>%<top%>:%>ㄴㅡㄴ #; !
%<nnc%>%<acc%>:%>ㄹㅡㄹ #; !
%<nnc%>%<nom%>:%>ㄱㅏ #; !
%<nnc%>%<com%>:%>ㅇㅘ #; !
%<nnc%>%<com%>:%>ㄹㅏㅇ #; !
%<nnc%>%<com%>:%>ㅎㅏㄱㅗ #; !
%<nnc%>%<ins%>:%>%{ㅇ%}%{ㅡ%}ㄹㅗ #; !
%<nnc%>%<gen%>:%>ㅇㅢ #; !
%<nnc%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:%>ㄲㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<aa%>%<dat%>:%>ㅇㅔㄱㅔ #; !
%<nnc%>%<dat%>:%>ㅇㅔ #; !
%<nnc%>%<aa%>%<loc%>:%>ㅇㅔㄱㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<loc%>:%>ㅇㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<voc%>:%>ㅇㅑ #; !
%<nnc%>%<exc%>:%>ㅁㅏㄴ #; !
%<nnc%>%<als%>:%>ㄷㅗ #; !
%<nnc%>%<evn%>:%>ㅁㅏㅈㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<snc%>:%>ㅂㅜㅌㅓ #; !

%<nnc%>%<pl%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹ # ;
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<top%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄴㅡㄴ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅡㄹ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄱㅏ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅘ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄹㅏㅇ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅎㅏㄱㅗ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅗ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅢ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄲㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<aa%>%<dat%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㄱㅔ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<aa%>%<loc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㄱㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅑ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<exc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅁㅏㄴ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<als%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄷㅗ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<evn%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅁㅏㅈㅓ #; !
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<snc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅂㅜㅌㅓ #; !

%<nnc%>%<cop%>:%>%{ㅇ%}%{ㅣ%}ㄷㅏ #; !
%<nnc%>%<cop%>:%>ㅇㅣㄷㅏ #; ! ! Dir/LR
%<nnc%>%<pl%>%<cop%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅣㄷㅏ #; !


LEXICON NNX !dependent noun

%<nnx%>:%> # ;
%<nnx%>%<top%>:%>ㄴㅡㄴ #; !
%<nnx%>%<acc%>:%>ㄹㅡㄹ #; !
%<nnx%>%<nom%>:%>ㄱㅏ #; !
%<nnx%>%<com%>:%>ㅇㅘ #; !
%<nnx%>%<com%>:%>ㄹㅏㅇ #; !
%<nnx%>%<com%>:%>ㅎㅏㄱㅗ #; !
%<nnx%>%<ins%>:%>%{ㅇ%}%{ㅡ%}ㄹㅗ #; !
%<nnx%>%<gen%>:%>ㅇㅢ #; !
%<nnx%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:%>ㄲㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnx%>%<aa%>%<dat%>:%>ㅇㅔㄱㅔ #; !
%<nnx%>%<dat%>:%>ㅇㅔ #; !
%<nnx%>%<aa%>%<loc%>:%>ㅇㅔㄱㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnx%>%<loc%>:%>ㅇㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnx%>%<voc%>:%>ㅇㅑ #; !
%<nnx%>%<exc%>:%>ㅁㅏㄴ #; !
%<nnx%>%<als%>:%>ㄷㅗ #; !
%<nnx%>%<evn%>:%>ㅁㅏㅈㅓ #; !
%<nnx%>%<snc%>:%>ㅂㅜㅌㅓ #; !

%<nnx%>%<pl%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹ # ;
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<top%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄴㅡㄴ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅡㄹ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄱㅏ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅘ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅏㅇ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅎㅏㄱㅗ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄹㅗ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅢ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄲㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<aa%>%<dat%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㄱㅔ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<aa%>%<loc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㄱㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅔㅅㅓ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<voc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅑ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<exc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅁㅏㄴ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<als%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㄷㅗ #; !
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<snc%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅂㅜㅌㅓ #; !

%<nnx%>%<cop%>:%>%{ㅇ%}%{ㅣ%}ㄷㅏ #; !
%<nnx%>%<cop%>:%>ㅇㅣㄷㅏ #; ! ! Dir/LR
%<nnx%>%<pl%>%<cop%>:%>ㄷㅡㄹㅇㅣㄷㅏ #; !

LEXICON Noun
가난:ㄱㅏㄴㅏㄴ NNC ; ! 
가사:ㄱㅏㅅㅏ NNC ; ! 
가입:ㄱㅏㅇㅣㅂ NNC ; ! 
가축:ㄱㅏㅊㅜㄱ NNC ; ! 
각각:ㄱㅏㄱㄱㅏㄱ NNC ; ! 
각종:ㄱㅏㄱㅈㅗㅇ NNC ; ! 
간접:ㄱㅏㄴㅈㅓㅂ NNC ; ! 
갈등:ㄱㅏㄹㄷㅡㅇ NNC ; ! 
감동적:ㄱㅏㅁㄷㅗㅇㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
감정:ㄱㅏㅁㅈㅓㅇ NNC ; ! 
강변:ㄱㅏㅇㅂㅕㄴ NNC ; ! 
강연:ㄱㅏㅇㅇㅕㄴ NNC ; ! 
개강:ㄱㅐㄱㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
개방적:ㄱㅐㅂㅏㅇㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
개성:ㄱㅐㅅㅓㅇ NNC ; ! 
개최:ㄱㅐㅊㅚ NNC ; ! 
거래:ㄱㅓㄹㅐ NNC ; ! 
건강식품:ㄱㅓㄴㄱㅏㅇㅅㅣㄱㅍㅜㅁ NNC ; ! 
건설:ㄱㅓㄴㅅㅓㄹ NNC ; ! 
걸음:ㄱㅓㄹㅇㅡㅁ NNC ; ! 
검색:ㄱㅓㅁㅅㅐㄱ NNC ; ! 
겉모습:ㄱㅓㅌㅁㅗㅅㅡㅂ NNC ; ! 
결과:ㄱㅕㄹㄱㅘ NNC ; ! 
결말:ㄱㅕㄹㅁㅏㄹ NNC ; ! 
겸손:ㄱㅕㅁㅅㅗㄴ NNC ; ! 
경력:ㄱㅕㅇㄹㅕㄱ NNC ; ! 
경영:ㄱㅕㅇㅇㅕㅇ NNC ; ! 
경제:ㄱㅕㅇㅈㅔ NNC ; ! 
경험:ㄱㅕㅇㅎㅓㅁ NNC ; ! 
계층:ㄱㅖㅊㅡㅇ NNC ; ! 
고민:ㄱㅗㅁㅣㄴ NNC ; ! 
고장:ㄱㅗㅈㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
고통:ㄱㅗㅌㅗㅇ NNC ; ! 
골치:ㄱㅗㄹㅊㅣ NNC ; ! 
공공장소:ㄱㅗㅇㄱㅗㅇㅈㅏㅇㅅㅗ NNC ; ! 
공사:ㄱㅗㅇㅅㅏ NNC ; ! 
공포:ㄱㅗㅇㅍㅗ NNC ; ! 
과로:ㄱㅘㄹㅗ NNC ; ! 
과소비:ㄱㅘㅅㅗㅂㅣ NNC ; ! 
과식:ㄱㅘㅅㅣㄱ NNC ; ! 
과음:ㄱㅘㅇㅡㅁ NNC ; ! 
과제:ㄱㅘㅈㅔ NNC ; ! 
관계자:ㄱㅘㄴㄱㅖㅈㅏ NNC ; ! 
관련:ㄱㅘㄴㄹㅕㄴ NNC ; ! 
관심:ㄱㅘㄴㅅㅣㅁ NNC ; ! 
광장:ㄱㅘㅇㅈㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
교재:ㄱㅛㅈㅐ NNC ; ! 
교통편:ㄱㅛㅌㅗㅇㅍㅕㄴ NNC ; ! 
구두쇠:ㄱㅜㄷㅜㅅㅚ NNC ; ! 
구멍:ㄱㅜㅁㅓㅇ NNC ; ! 
구성:ㄱㅜㅅㅓㅇ NNC ; ! 
구조:ㄱㅜㅈㅗ NNC ; ! 
국가:ㄱㅜㄱㄱㅏ NNC ; ! 
국민:ㄱㅜㄱㅁㅣㄴ NNC ; ! 
군대:ㄱㅜㄴㄷㅐ NNC ; ! 
귀국:ㄱㅟㄱㅜㄱ NNC ; ! 
근무:ㄱㅡㄴㅁㅜ NNC ; ! 
글자:ㄱㅡㄹㅈㅏ NNC ; ! 
기념일:ㄱㅣㄴㅕㅁㅇㅣㄹ NNC ; ! 
기록:ㄱㅣㄹㅗㄱ NNC ; ! 
기쁨:ㄱㅣㅃㅡㅁ NNC ; ! 
기업:ㄱㅣㅇㅓㅂ NNC ; ! 
기호:ㄱㅣㅎㅗ NNC ; ! 
긴장감:ㄱㅣㄴㅈㅏㅇㄱㅏㅁ NNC ; ! 
깊이:ㄱㅣㅍㅇㅣ NNC ; ! 
나머지:ㄴㅏㅁㅓㅈㅣ NNC ; ! 
남녀평등:ㄴㅏㅁㄴㅕㅍㅕㅇㄷㅡㅇ NNC ; ! 
노동:ㄴㅗㄷㅗㅇ NNC ; ! 
녹음:ㄴㅗㄱㅇㅡㅁ NNC ; ! 
농춘:ㄴㅗㅇㅊㅜㄴ NNC ; ! 
능력:ㄴㅡㅇㄹㅕㄱ NNC ; ! 
단속:ㄷㅏㄴㅅㅗㄱ NNC ; ! 
당장:ㄷㅏㅇㅈㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
대여:ㄷㅐㅇㅕ NNC ; ! 
대출:ㄷㅐㅊㅜㄹ NNC ; ! 
도구:ㄷㅗㄱㅜ NNC ; ! 
도중:ㄷㅗㅈㅜㅇ NNC ; ! 
동작:ㄷㅗㅇㅈㅏㄱ NNC ; ! 
마디:ㅁㅏㄷㅣ NNC ; ! 
마중:ㅁㅏㅈㅜㅇ NNC ; ! 
만족감:ㅁㅏㄴㅈㅗㄱㄱㅏㅁ NNC ; ! 
매력:ㅁㅐㄹㅕㄱ NNC ; ! 
매진:ㅁㅐㅈㅣㄴ NNC ; ! 
먼지:ㅁㅓㄴㅈㅣ NNC ; ! 
모습:ㅁㅗㅅㅡㅂ NNC ; ! 
목숨:ㅁㅗㄱㅅㅜㅁ NNC ; ! 
무관심:ㅁㅜㄱㅘㄴㅅㅣㅁ NNC ; ! 
무덤:ㅁㅜㄷㅓㅁ NNC ; ! 
문명:ㅁㅜㄴㅁㅕㅇ NNC ; ! 
문화유산:ㅁㅜㄴㅎㅘㅇㅠㅅㅏㄴ NNC ; ! 
물질:ㅁㅜㄹㅈㅣㄹ NNC ; ! 
민요:ㅁㅣㄴㅇㅛ NNC ; ! 
바깥:ㅂㅏㄲㅏㅌ NNC ; ! 
반복:ㅂㅏㄴㅂㅗㄱ NNC ; ! 
발걸음:ㅂㅏㄹㄱㅓㄹㅇㅡㅁ NNC ; ! 
발명:ㅂㅏㄹㅁㅕㅇ NNC ; ! 
방해:ㅂㅏㅇㅎㅐ NNC ; ! 
배우자:ㅂㅐㅇㅜㅈㅏ NNC ; ! 
범인:ㅂㅓㅁㅇㅣㄴ NNC ; ! 
변명:ㅂㅕㄴㅁㅕㅇ NNC ; ! 
보고:ㅂㅗㄱㅗ NNC ; ! 
보충:ㅂㅗㅊㅜㅇ NNC ; ! 
부담:ㅂㅜㄷㅏㅁ NNC ; ! 
부서:ㅂㅜㅅㅓ NNC ; ! 
부장:ㅂㅜㅈㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
분리수거:ㅂㅜㄴㄹㅣㅅㅜㄱㅓ NNC ; ! 
불만:ㅂㅜㄹㅁㅏㄴ NNC ; ! 
불안감:ㅂㅜㄹㅇㅏㄴㄱㅏㅁ NNC ; ! 
비교적:ㅂㅣㄱㅛㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
사건:ㅅㅏㄱㅓㄴ NNC ; ! 
사망:ㅅㅏㅁㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
사은품:ㅅㅏㅇㅡㄴㅍㅜㅁ NNC ; ! 
사회생활:ㅅㅏㅎㅚㅅㅐㅇㅎㅘㄹ NNC ; ! 
삶:ㅅㅏㄻ NNC ; ! 
상대방:ㅅㅏㅇㄷㅐㅂㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
상징:ㅅㅏㅇㅈㅣㅇ NNC ; ! 
상황:ㅅㅏㅇㅎㅘㅇ NNC ; ! 
생산:ㅅㅐㅇㅅㅏㄴ NNC ; ! 
서랍:ㅅㅓㄹㅏㅂ NNC ; ! 
설득:ㅅㅓㄹㄷㅡㄱ NNC ; ! 
성별:ㅅㅓㅇㅂㅕㄹ NNC ; ! 
성형:ㅅㅓㅇㅎㅕㅇ NNC ; ! 
세련:ㅅㅔㄹㅕㄴ NNC ; ! 
소규모:ㅅㅗㄱㅠㅁㅗ NNC ; ! 
소비:ㅅㅗㅂㅣ NNC ; ! 
소음:ㅅㅗㅇㅡㅁ NNC ; ! 
속력:ㅅㅗㄱㄹㅕㄱ NNC ; ! 
수다:ㅅㅜㄷㅏ NNC ; ! 
수면:ㅅㅜㅁㅕㄴ NNC ; ! 
수준:ㅅㅜㅈㅜㄴ NNC ; ! 
숙박비:ㅅㅜㄱㅂㅏㄱㅂㅣ NNC ; ! 
습기:ㅅㅡㅂㄱㅣ NNC ; ! 
시도:ㅅㅣㄷㅗ NNC ; ! 
신고:ㅅㅣㄴㄱㅗ NNC ; ! 
신제품:ㅅㅣㄴㅈㅔㅍㅜㅁ NNC ; ! 
실력:ㅅㅣㄹㄹㅕㄱ NNC ; ! 
실용적:ㅅㅣㄹㅇㅛㅇㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
싫증:ㅅㅣㅀㅈㅡㅇ NNC ; ! 
안부:ㅇㅏㄴㅂㅜ NNC ; ! 
야간:ㅇㅑㄱㅏㄴ NNC ; ! 
억양:ㅇㅓㄱㅇㅑㅇ NNC ; ! 
엉망:ㅇㅓㅇㅁㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
역사적:ㅇㅕㄱㅅㅏㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
연속:ㅇㅕㄴㅅㅗㄱ NNC ; ! 
예외:ㅇㅖㅇㅚ NNC ; ! 
완성:ㅇㅘㄴㅅㅓㅇ NNC ; ! 
요청:ㅇㅛㅊㅓㅇ NNC ; ! 
용서:ㅇㅛㅇㅅㅓ NNC ; ! 
우울증:ㅇㅜㅇㅜㄹㅈㅡㅇ NNC ; ! 
원인:ㅇㅝㄴㅇㅣㄴ NNC ; ! 
응원:ㅇㅡㅇㅇㅝㄴ NNC ; ! 
의사소통:ㅇㅢㅅㅏㅅㅗㅌㅗㅇ NNC ; ! 
이국적:ㅇㅣㄱㅜㄱㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
이자:ㅇㅣㅈㅏ NNC ; ! 
인간적:ㅇㅣㄴㄱㅏㄴㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
인쇄:ㅇㅣㄴㅅㅙ NNC ; ! 
일생:ㅇㅣㄹㅅㅐㅇ NNC ; ! 
자극적:ㅈㅏㄱㅡㄱㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
자원:ㅈㅏㅇㅝㄴ NNC ; ! 
장사:ㅈㅏㅇㅅㅏ NNC ; ! 
저장:ㅈㅓㅈㅏㅇ NNC ; ! 
전문적:ㅈㅓㄴㅁㅜㄴㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
전통적:ㅈㅓㄴㅌㅗㅇㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
정상적:ㅈㅓㅇㅅㅏㅇㅈㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
정치:ㅈㅓㅇㅊㅣ NNC ; ! 
제안:ㅈㅔㅇㅏㄴ NNC ; ! 
조언:ㅈㅗㅇㅓㄴ NNC ; ! 
주택:ㅈㅜㅌㅐㄱ NNC ; ! 
지식:ㅈㅣㅅㅣㄱ NNC ; ! 
지휘자:ㅈㅣㅎㅟㅈㅏ NNC ; ! 
집들이:ㅈㅣㅂㄷㅡㄹㅇㅣ NNC ; ! 
차례:ㅊㅏㄹㅖ NNC ; ! 
책임:ㅊㅐㄱㅇㅣㅁ NNC ; ! 
체온:ㅊㅔㅇㅗㄴ NNC ; ! 
최대:ㅊㅚㄷㅐ NNC ; ! 
최종:ㅊㅚㅈㅗㅇ NNC ; ! 
추억:ㅊㅜㅇㅓㄱ NNC ; ! 
친환경:ㅊㅣㄴㅎㅘㄴㄱㅕㅇ NNC ; ! 
편식:ㅍㅕㄴㅅㅣㄱ NNC ; ! 
폭설:ㅍㅗㄱㅅㅓㄹ NNC ; ! 
품절:ㅍㅜㅁㅈㅓㄹ NNC ; ! 
핑계:ㅍㅣㅇㄱㅖ NNC ; ! 
학비:ㅎㅏㄱㅂㅣ NNC ; ! 
한국학:ㅎㅏㄴㄱㅜㄱㅎㅏㄱ NNC ; ! 
한정식:ㅎㅏㄴㅈㅓㅇㅅㅣㄱ NNC ; ! 
해결책:ㅎㅐㄱㅕㄹㅊㅐㄱ NNC ; ! 
현대인:ㅎㅕㄴㄷㅐㅇㅣㄴ NNC ; ! 
형태:ㅎㅕㅇㅌㅐ NNC ; ! 
호기심:ㅎㅗㄱㅣㅅㅣㅁ NNC ; ! 
환경:ㅎㅘㄴㄱㅕㅇ NNC ; ! 
회식:ㅎㅚㅅㅣㄱ NNC ; ! 
효과:ㅎㅛㄱㅘ NNC ; ! 
희생자:ㅎㅢㅅㅐㅇㅈㅏ NNC ; ! 
길:ㄱㅣㄹ NNC ; !
피청구인:ㅍㅣㅊㅓㅇㄱㅜㅇㅣㄴ NNC ; !
당시:ㄷㅏㅇㅅㅣ NNC ; !
글:ㄱㅡㄹ NNC ; !
건강:ㄱㅓㄴㄱㅏㅇ NNC ; !
자연:ㅈㅏㅇㅕㄴ NNC ; !	
제국:ㅈㅔㄱㅜㄱ NNC ; !
시국:ㅅㅣㄱㅜㄱ NNC ; !		
지금:ㅈㅣㄱㅡㅁ NNC ; !
일정:ㅇㅣㄹㅈㅓㅇ NNC ; !
이후:ㅇㅣㅎㅜ NNC ; !
민주당:ㅁㅣㄴㅈㅜㄷㅏㅇ NNC ; !
토론:ㅌㅗㄹㅗㄴ NNC ; !
인민:ㅇㅣㄴㅁㅣㄴ NNC ; !
자신:ㅈㅏㅅㅣㄴ NNC ; !
4월:4ㅇㅝㄹ NNC ; !
8월:8ㅇㅝㄹ NNC ; !
12월:12ㅇㅝㄹ NNC ; !
도준:ㄷㅗㅈㅜㄴ NPR ; !
민도준:ㅁㅣㄴㄷㅗㅈㅜㄴ NPR ; !
조나단:ㅈㅗㄴㅏㄷㅏㄴ NPR ; !
워싱턴:ㅇㅝㅅㅣㅇㅌㅓㄴ NPR ; !
노무현:ㄴㅗㅁㅜㅎㅕㄴ NPR ; !
최순실:ㅊㅚㅅㅜㄴㅅㅣㄹ NPR ; !
전두환:ㅈㅓㄴㄷㅜㅎㅘㄴ NPR ; !
자레드:ㅈㅏㄹㅔㄷㅡ NPR ; !
타하:ㅌㅏㅎㅏ NPR ; !
사히르:ㅅㅏㅎㅣㄹㅡ NPR ; !
스탈린:ㅅㅡㅌㅏㄹㄹㅣㄴ NPR ; !
소비에트:ㅅㅗㅂㅣㅇㅔㅌㅡ NPR ; !
세월호:ㅅㅔㅇㅝㄹㅎㅗ NPR ; !
최서원:ㅊㅚㅅㅓㅇㅝㄴ NPR ; !
영:ㅇㅕㅇ NPR ; ! uk
미:ㅁㅣ NPR ; ! us
동아시아:ㄷㅗㅇㅇㅏㅅㅣㅇㅏ NPR ; ! us
오바마:ㅇㅗㅂㅏㅁㅏ NPR ; ! obama
트럼프:ㅌㅡㄹㅓㅁㅍㅡ NPR ; ! trump
미국:ㅁㅣㄱㅜㄱ NPR ; !
폴란드:ㅍㅗㄹㄹㅏㄴㄷㅡ NPR ; !
피우수트스키:ㅍㅣㅇㅜㅅㅜㅌㅡㅅㅡㅋㅣ NPR ; !
일본:ㅇㅣㄹㅂㅗㄴ NPR ; !
소련:ㅅㅗㄹㅕㄴ NPR ; !
독일:ㄷㅗㄱㅇㅣㄹ NPR ; !
히틀러:ㅎㅣㅌㅡㄹㄹㅓ NPR ; !
윈도우:ㅇㅟㄴㄷㅗㅇㅜ NPR ; !
중국:ㅈㅜㅇㄱㅜㄱ NPR ; !
수:ㅅㅜ NNX ; !
그:ㄱㅡ NNX ; !
등:ㄷㅡㅇ NNX ; !
점:ㅈㅓㅁ NNX ; !
것:ㄱㅓㅅ NNX ; !
명:ㅁㅕㅇ NNX ; !
할:ㅎㅏㄹ NNX ; !
점:ㅈㅓㅁ NNX ; !
곳:ㄱㅗㅅ NNX ; !
바:ㅂㅏ NNX ; !
때:ㄸㅐ NNX ; !
거:ㄱㅓ NNX ; !
중:ㅈㅜㅇ NNX ; !
